Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 4 MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION
§ 49-435. Proportional registration of commercial vehicles.

Any owner engaged in operating one (1) or more fleets of commercial vehicles may, in lieu of the registration fees imposed by section 49-434, Idaho Code, register each fleet for operation in this state by filing an application with the department that shall contain the information required by the international registration plan (IRP) agreement. Any owner who makes application for proportional registration under the provisions of the international registration plan shall comply with the terms and conditions of the IRP agreement.

The department shall register the vehicle so described and identified and may issue license plates or other suitable identification device for each vehicle listed in the application upon payment of the fees required under subsections (1) and (8) of section 49-434, Idaho Code, and an additional identification charge of eight dollars ($8.00) per vehicle. The fees collected for the additional identification shall be deposited to the state highway account. A registration card shall be issued in print or electronically for each proportionally registered vehicle appropriately identifying it, which shall be carried and available on an electronic device or in or upon the vehicle identified at all times.

Fleet vehicles so registered and identified shall be deemed to be fully licensed and registered in this state for any type of movement or operation.

The right to the privilege and benefits of proportional registration of fleet vehicles extended by this section, or by any contract, agreement, arrangement or declaration made under the authority provided in section 49-201, Idaho Code, shall be subject to the condition that each fleet vehicle proportionally registered shall also be proportionally or otherwise properly registered in at least one (1) other jurisdiction during the period for which it is proportionally registered in this state.

No provision of this section relating to proportional registration of fleet vehicles shall be construed as requiring any vehicle to be proportionally registered if it is otherwise registered in this state for the operation in which it is engaged, including regular registration or temporary trip permit.

§ 49-435A. Multijurisdictional use fee agreements. [Repealed.]

§ 49-436. Quarterly reports — Maintaining records — Penalties — Deposit or bond to secure payment of fees

Appeal. [Repealed.]

§ 49-437. Increase in maximum gross weight — Fees for remaining portion of year.

When a motor vehicle registered under section 49-434 or 49-435, Idaho Code, has once been registered and during the year of that registration increases the maximum gross weight, the higher fee due for the weight increase shall be offset by the fee already paid. The fee already paid and the fee due shall be prorated by one-twelfth (1/12) for each month already expired in the registration period. The difference between the two (2) fees shall be the balance due for the remainder of the registration period. If an owner changes the weight during a registration period, the weight change shall not result in a refund of the fees already paid.

If a motor vehicle is not operated on any highway during the first months of a registration period, the owner may at any time thereafter be registered for the remainder of the registration period on payment of all fees, rounded to the nearest whole dollar, as provided in this chapter, less one-twelfth (1/12) of such fees for each full calendar month which has expired prior to registering, but in no event shall the minimum fee be less than five dollars ($5.00).

§ 49-438. Penalty for exceeding registered gross weight or permitted maximum registered gross weight.

Any person who shall operate, cause, permit, or suffer to be operated upon any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross weight in excess of the registered maximum gross weight of the vehicle specified in this title shall have committed a violation under the infraction or misdemeanor provisions of section 49-1013, Idaho Code.

Any person who shall operate, cause, permit, or suffer to be operated upon any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles with a gross weight in excess of the registered maximum gross weight not authorized by a valid permit issued pursuant to section 49-432, Idaho Code, shall have committed a violation under the infraction or misdemeanor provisions of section 49-1013, Idaho Code.

§ 49-439. Audit guidelines.

The state tax commission on behalf of the department may audit an owner of motor vehicles subject to fees pursuant to this chapter.

Every owner whose fees are computed as specified in section 49-434 or 49-435, Idaho Code, except those registering under subsection (8)(c) of section 49-434, Idaho Code, for over fifty thousand (50,000) miles driven, shall maintain records and permit the state tax commission to inspect the records upon request to substantiate that the actual miles traveled, if using a mileage schedule in subsection (8)(c) of section 49-434, Idaho Code, are less than the maximum mileage schedule.

When the records are maintained outside this state by owners engaged in transportation in this state, the owner shall reimburse the state tax commission for reasonable expenses incurred by the state tax commission in conducting audits of those records and accounts at the out-of-state location. The owner or the state tax commission may request that the records be presented at a place within the state designated by the state tax commission. The records must be presented by a representative of the owner who is familiar with the records and who is responsible for the safekeeping of the records.

Every owner is required to maintain records for the current year and the three (3) years immediately preceding. If an assessment has been made, such audit assessment may be collected by a proceeding in court within a period of three (3) years after the assessment or a final order entered pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.

An owner who fails to maintain records as required by the provisions of this section may have the registration of all vehicles registered under section 49-434 or 49-435, Idaho Code, suspended until such time as adequate records as required by the provisions of this section are provided. In the event that the owner does not produce records, the state tax commission may generate a notice of deficiency based on an estimate of the operation. The state tax commission shall develop a methodology to be used to calculate a notice of deficiency based on an estimate of the operation. That methodology shall be in accordance with the international registration plan and international fuel tax agreement guidelines.

The state tax commission shall provide the carrier with notice of deficiency and the opportunity to use the appeals process prior to a suspension. An owner may contest a notice of deficiency made by the state tax commission within thirty (30) days from receipt of the notice by filing an appeal in accordance with sections 63-3045, 63-3045B, 63-3047, 63-3048 and 63-3049, Idaho Code.

§ 49-440. [Reserved.]

§ 49-442. Application for registration — Receipt for fee

Record of applicants. [Repealed.]

§ 49-443. License plates to be furnished by department — Form and contents.

The assessor or the department shall furnish to every owner whose vehicle is registered or licensed by that office, pursuant to sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, one (1) license plate for vehicles registered under the provisions of section 49-406, 49-406A or 49-408, Idaho Code, or a motorcycle, trailer, truck-tractor, or semitrailer; one (1) restricted vehicle license plate for all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles and motorbikes licensed pursuant to this chapter; and two (2) license plates for every other motor vehicle. If a vehicle is issued one (1) plate only, that plate shall be displayed in accordance with the provisions of section 49-428, Idaho Code. For vehicles registered under the provisions of section 49-407, Idaho Code, the applicant shall provide one (1) plate to be displayed on the rear of the vehicle.

License plates shall be valid for a period of ten (10) years beginning with the date of issuance of new plates. At the end of the ninth year, the registered owner shall receive notice of the date upon which the plates will expire.

If a license plate number has expired as provided in subsection (2) of this section and is not renewed within sixty (60) days of its expiration, the plate number shall be available for use by another registrant. To obtain a specific number in the recycled license plate number file, the owner of a registered vehicle may contact the county regarding availability.
The provisions of this subsection shall apply only to vehicles registered under the provisions of section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, and section 49-434(1), Idaho Code, as it applies to noncommercial vehicles.

License plates issued for vehicles required to be registered in accordance with the provisions of sections 49-402 and 49-402A, Idaho Code, shall be issued color-coded red, white or blue registration validation stickers showing the year of registration. Each registration validation sticker shall bear a number from 1 through 12, which number shall correspond to the month of the calendar year in which the registration of the vehicle expires and shall be affixed to the lower right-hand corner of the plates within the outlined rectangular area.

License plates for utility trailers registered under the provisions of section 49-402A, Idaho Code, that are issued for five (5) or ten (10) years and license plates for rental utility trailers registered under the provisions of section 49-434, Idaho Code, that are issued for up to five (5) years shall use the design in effect on the date of manufacture. If a design change occurs, plates from the effective date of the design change shall be manufactured using the new design. Unexpired plates need not be reissued to conform to a design change.

For license plates that are lost, stolen, mutilated, or illegible, the owner shall apply for a duplicate or substitute. The assessor shall also furnish for each registration, and to validate the license plate, a pressure-sensitive, uniquely numbered, color-coded red, white or blue registration sticker, except for trailers and semitrailers registered under the provisions in section 49-434, Idaho Code. License plates issued for state, county and city motor vehicles shall be valid for ten (10) years pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and remain on the vehicle for which issued from year to year, and need no renewal or validation sticker.

Whenever a vehicle is completely destroyed by fire or accident and the operator submits satisfactory proof of that destruction to the department or appropriate assessor’s office, or the owner wishes to transfer the remaining registration, use increment and fees shall be transferred to the replacement vehicle for a service transfer fee of five dollars ($5.00), which fee shall be retained by the registering authority. None of the original fees shall be subject to refund.

The department shall furnish a printed or an electronic copy of the registration card to every owner whose vehicle is registered under sections 49-434 and 49-435, Idaho Code. [-]

The board shall have authority to require the return to the department of all license plates and registration stickers upon termination of the lawful use of them by the owner.

The board may promulgate such rules as are necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

Commencing January 1, 1992, the color and design of the plates shall be comparable to the color and design of the statehood centennial issue of license plates with blue numerals and letters on a multicolored red, white and blue background. Each license plate must bear upon its face the inscriptions “Famous Potatoes” and “Scenic Idaho.” The restricted vehicle license plate for all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles and motorbikes shall be a white background with black numerals and letters, with “Idaho Restricted Vehicle” and the year of its expiration on its face and no other inscription. The restricted vehicle license plate shall be the same size required for the motorcycle license plate.

Every license plate shall have displayed upon it the registration number assigned to the vehicle and its owner and the name “Idaho” which may be abbreviated. The plates issued under the provisions of section 49-402(1), Idaho Code, and the required letters and numerals, including an identification of the county in which the motor vehicle to which the plates will be affixed is registered, shall be of sufficient size to be plainly readable from a distance of seventy-five (75) feet during daylight, and each license plate and registration sticker shall be treated with a fully reflectorized material according to specifications prescribed by the board.

For specialty license plate programs discontinued pursuant to the provisions of section 49-402C, Idaho Code, a registrant with a specialty license plate currently registered under the program may use such license plate for up to ten (10) years from the date of issuance. This provision is intended to permit the use of the specialty plate by the registrant regardless of the number of persons who purchase the specialty plate. The registrant shall be required to pay the special plate program fees provided for specialty plates pursuant to this chapter. Such fees shall be deposited into the state highway account. For purposes of section 49-434, Idaho Code, as it applies to commercial vehicles, and section 49-435, Idaho Code, the department shall provide new plates bearing the same number or, upon request from the registered owner, the next available number.

§ 49-443A. License plate reservation program. [Repealed.]

§ 49-443B. License plates for state vehicles and vehicles belonging to taxing districts.

License plates for state vehicles and vehicles belonging to taxing districts shall be valid for a period of ten (10) years pursuant to section 49-443(2), Idaho Code, and shall remain on the vehicle to which it is issued until transferred to another vehicle or until it is canceled by the department. The department shall be reimbursed by state agencies and the taxing districts for the cost of providing license plates. The department may develop rules to administer this license plate program.

Each license plate issued pursuant to this section shall bear a designator to identify the agency, entity or office to which a vehicle belongs or, for trailers or motorcycles, to specify the plate type. Any vehicle with a license plate issued pursuant to this section that does not comply with the provisions of this subsection as of the effective date of this act shall be reregistered, subject to a reregistration fee of twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50), within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this act. The designators shall be as follows:

Personalized or specialty license plates are exempt from the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

Designator Agency, entity, office, or plate type

A Trailer (all weights); small plate

C School district or miscellaneous city or county agencies, entities or offices

D Highway district

F Fire district

G Fish and game

H Department of health and welfare

ISP Idaho state police

J Department of commerce or department of labor

L Law enforcement

M Motorcycle; small plate

P City police

R Department of parks and recreation

SO Sheriff’s office

T Department of transportation

X Miscellaneous state agencies, entities or offices

Y Irrigation district

Z Department of lands

§ 49-444. Recreation vehicle registration.

An applicant for a recreational vehicle registration shall be required to obtain a recreational vehicle annual license as provided in sections 49-445 through 49-448, Idaho Code, in conjunction with the registration. Truck campers need not be registered before the county assessor can issue a recreational vehicle annual license.

§ 49-445. Recreational vehicle annual license.

There is levied and there shall be collected an annual license fee on each recreational vehicle in Idaho, except recreational vehicles in possession of a manufacturer or dealer and offered for sale or resale. If the recreational vehicle is registered as a motor vehicle under the provisions of this chapter, the annual license fee imposed in this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of the motor vehicle registration fees. Initial license fees for recreational vehicles shall be prorated on a monthly basis for a new owner. Subsequent renewals of the annual license shall require annual fees regardless of the registration date.

The annual license fee imposed upon each recreational vehicle shall be eight dollars and fifty cents ($8.50) for a market value of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, and an additional five dollars ($5.00) for each additional one thousand dollars ($1,000) or portion of it, of market value.

Payment of the annual license fee shall license the recreational vehicle for a calendar year, irrespective of the month in which it is registered, change of ownership of the vehicle, or change of county of residence of the owner. The recreational vehicle annual license shall expire midnight December 31 of each year.

The license sticker shall be placed on the rear of the recreational vehicle in a manner that is completely visible and shall be kept in a legible condition at all times.

A recreational vehicle that conformed with the definition of a park model recreational vehicle in section 49-117, Idaho Code, when new, may be:

Titled under the provisions of chapter 5, title 49, Idaho Code; and

Licensed and registered under the provisions of this chapter unless it:

Is permanently attached to a foundation;

Has an attached building addition; or

Has been substantially modified in such a way that it no longer meets the definition of a park model recreational vehicle in section 49-117, Idaho Code.

§ 49-446. County assessor to administer and collect license fee.

The county assessor shall administer and collect the recreational vehicle annual license fee.

Market value of recreational vehicles shall be determined by the county assessor according to the rules and regulations of the state tax commission. Whenever indices are available, the rules and regulations shall use any standard industry indices of retail value of recreational vehicles to determine market value.

§ 49-447. Department to provide identification.

The department of parks and recreation shall devise and provide to county assessors suitable identification stickers for attachment to or placement on recreational vehicles to indicate that the annual recreational vehicle license fee has been paid. The sticker shall be of suitable size and design for easy identification, and shall show the year and month of the year in which the license expires. The department shall also provide suitable license forms and all other forms required for the purpose of licensing and shall prepay all charges including mailing fees. Each recreational vehicle license shall be filed annually by the department under a distinctive number assigned to the vehicle and alphabetically under the name of the owner.

§ 49-448. Disposition of fees.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the revenues received from the annual license fees imposed by section 49-445, Idaho Code, for recreational vehicle registration shall be paid over monthly to the county treasurer, to be distributed as follows:

Two dollars ($2.00) from each recreational vehicle license sold shall be apportioned to the county current expense fund, which shall be deemed necessary costs of collection and administration;

From the balance remaining, ninety-nine percent (99%) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in a fund known as the “state recreational vehicle fund,” which is established in the state treasury, and one percent (1%) shall be distributed to the search and rescue fund created in section 67-2913, Idaho Code;

One hundred percent (100%) of the revenues received from the annual license fees for the registration of each park model recreational vehicle of such size and weight as to require a special highway movement permit shall be apportioned to the county current expense fund where the park model recreational vehicle is located.

§ 49-449. Cancellation of registration upon notice of theft.

Whenever the owner of any motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer which is stolen files an affidavit with a law enforcement agency alleging such fact, the department shall cancel the registration of such vehicle upon the request of the owner.

§ 49-450. Additional fee for each plate issued.

In addition to the vehicle registration fee provided by law, whenever any plate is issued for vehicle registration, there shall be charged a fee of three dollars and seventy-five cents ($3.75) per plate, which shall be deposited into the plate manufacturing account created in section 49-450A, Idaho Code. The actual cost of producing and distributing license plates and the fifty cents (50¢) per plate fee designated to the Idaho heritage trust for the use of the copyrighted design provided for in section 49-443(1), Idaho Code, shall be paid from the plate manufacturing account. The difference between deposits into the account and disbursements out of the account not anticipated for future production cost increases, shall be transferred by the state controller from the plate manufacturing account to the highway distribution account as established in section 40-701, Idaho Code, for apportionment as designated in that section. Funds designated to the Idaho heritage trust shall be matched with equal funds from other sources for funding projects designed to preserve Idaho’s historic resources.

§ 49-450A. Plate manufacturing account.

There is hereby created in the state treasury an account to be known as the “plate manufacturing account” for the purpose of paying the actual cost to produce and distribute license plates and to pay costs related to use of the centennial design on the license plate. All moneys in this account are hereby continuously appropriated to the department. Any additional funds required to pay plate production and distribution costs will be transferred by the state controller from the state highway account. Once an adequate cash balance has accumulated in the plate manufacturing account, the state controller will transfer funds from the plate manufacturing account to reimburse the state highway account.

§ 49-451. Vehicle license cost recovery fee — Limitations.

A car rental company may include separately stated surcharges, fees or charges in a rental agreement, which may include, but shall not be limited to, vehicle license cost recovery fees, airport access fees, airport concession fees and all applicable taxes.

If a car rental company includes a vehicle license cost recovery fee as a separately stated charge in a rental transaction, the amount of the fee shall represent the car rental company’s good-faith estimate of the car rental company’s daily charge as calculated by the car rental company to recover its actual total annual motor vehicle licensing, titling, registration, plating and inspection costs.

If the total amount of the vehicle license cost recovery fees collected by a car rental company under this section in any calendar year exceeds the car rental company’s actual costs to license, title, register and plate motor vehicles and have the same inspected for that calendar year, the car rental company shall retain the excess amount and adjust the estimated average per vehicle licensing, titling, registration, plating and inspection charge for the following calendar year by a corresponding amount.

For purposes of this section, “vehicle license cost recovery fee” means a charge that may be separately stated and charged on the rental contract in a vehicle rental transaction originating in this state to recover costs incurred by a car rental company to license, title, register, plate and inspect rental vehicles.

§ 49-452. Emergency medical services fee.

An emergency medical services fee of one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) shall be collected in addition to each motor vehicle registration fee amount collected under the provisions of this chapter, with the exception of those vehicles proportionally registered under section 49-435, Idaho Code. Twenty-five cents (25¢) of the fee shall be retained by the county of residence for use in funding local emergency medical service costs. One dollar ($1.00) of the fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services fund established in section 56-1018, Idaho Code.

For vehicles registered under the provisions of section 49-402B, Idaho Code, the fee shall be two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50). Fifty cents (50¢) of the fee shall be retained by the county of residence for use in funding local emergency medical services costs. Two dollars ($2.00) of the fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the emergency medical services fund established in section 56-1018, Idaho Code.

§ 49-453. Motorcycle safety program fee.

A motorcycle safety program fee of six dollars ($6.00) shall be collected in addition to each motorcycle registration fee assessed pursuant to section 49-402, Idaho Code. Such fees shall be deposited to the motorcycle safety program fund established in section 33-4904, Idaho Code.

§ 49-454. Project choice fee.

A project choice program fee of three dollars ($3.00) shall be collected in addition to each registration fee assessed pursuant to section 49-402(1), (2) or (3), 49-411, 49-412 or 49-434(1), Idaho Code. Such fees shall be deposited to the Idaho law enforcement fund established in section 67-2914, Idaho Code.

The project choice program fee shall be collected and deposited pursuant to subsection (1) of this section for registrations for calendar year 2007 and thereafter.

The project choice fee shall be used, subject to appropriation, exclusively for the purposes of creating a career ladder within the Idaho state police and to provide salaries to encourage the hiring and retention of trained and qualified employees for Idaho state police positions. Idaho state police personnel who have participated in and benefited from the use of the project choice fee, as of July 1, 2010, shall continue to participate in and benefit from the project choice fee while employed by the Idaho state police. Provided however, that beginning July 1, 2010, the use of the project choice fee shall be restricted in the following manner: the project choice fee shall be used exclusively for the purposes of creating a career ladder for commissioned officers, dispatch personnel and forensic personnel within the Idaho state police; and to provide salaries to encourage the hiring and retention of trained and qualified commissioned officers, dispatch personnel and forensic personnel.

§ 49-455. [Reserved.]

It shall be unlawful for any person:

To operate or for the owner to permit the operation upon a highway of any motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer which is not registered and which does not have attached and displayed the license plates assigned to it for the current registration year, subject to the exemptions allowed in sections 49-426, 49-431 and 49-432, Idaho Code.

To operate or for the owner to permit the operation on state and federal lands or upon highways, or sections of highways, as permitted under section 49-426(3) and (4), Idaho Code, any all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle or motorbike that does not have a valid and properly displayed restricted license plate issued pursuant to this chapter and attached registration sticker issued pursuant to section 67-7122, Idaho Code, subject to the exemptions allowed in section 49-426(2), Idaho Code.

To display or cause or permit to be displayed, or to have in possession any registration card or license plate knowing the same to be fictitious or to have been canceled, revoked, suspended or altered.

To lend or knowingly permit the use by one not entitled to any registration card or license plate issued to the person so lending or permitting that use.

To fail or refuse to surrender to the department, upon demand, any registration card or license plate which has been suspended, canceled or revoked.

To use a false or fictitious name or address in any application for the registration of any vehicle or for any renewal or duplicate, or knowingly to make a false statement or conceal a material fact or otherwise commit a fraud in any application.

§ 49-457. Electric vehicle fee — Plug-in hybrid vehicle fee.

An electric vehicle fee of one hundred forty dollars ($140) shall be collected in addition to all other registration fees assessed pursuant to this chapter on each electric vehicle registered. Provided however, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to neighborhood electric vehicles as defined in sections 49-115 and 49-123, Idaho Code.

A plug-in hybrid vehicle fee of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) shall be collected in addition to all other registration fees assessed pursuant to this chapter on each plug-in hybrid vehicle registered.

All fees provided for in this section shall be deposited to the highway distribution account as established in section 40-701, Idaho Code, and shall be apportioned as provided for in that section.

For purposes of this chapter, “electric vehicle” means a vehicle powered only by a form of electricity and “plug-in hybrid vehicle” means a motor vehicle with a hybrid propulsion system that operates on both electricity obtained from the grid and traditional fuel.

§ 49-458. Military vehicles.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, a vehicle built for the United States armed forces may be registered and operated on public highways of this state, because such vehicles were manufactured in accordance with department of defense military safety standards. A federal form 97 shall be provided at the time of registration. If no federal form 97 is available, the applicant may apply for a conditional title.

§ 49-415G. Idaho north America plate — Special permanent or business logo.

§ 49-420G. Idaho boy scout plates. [Repealed.]

§ 49-441. Owner to secure registration from a county assessor or from board. [Repealed.]

§ 49-456. Violations of registration provisions.